District of Columbia statutes.
12-308

Actions by the United States.

Sections 12-301 , 12-302 , 12-305 , and 12-307 do not apply to an action in which the United States is the real and not merely the nominal plaintiff.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 511, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 12-308.
1973 Ed., § 12-308.